Maryland, session 2026, SB0317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
12–102.1.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0317*

SENATE BILL 317
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ACTIVE DUTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(4) “OBLIGATION” MEANS A LOAN OR ANY OTHER FINANCING
ARRANGEMENT MADE UNDER THIS TITLE.
(5) “SERVICE MEMBER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO AN OBLIGATION HELD JOINTLY BY
AN ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER AND THE ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER’S SPOUSE.
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (E) AND (F) OF THIS SECTION AND
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS TITLE, A CREDITOR MAY NOT
CHARGE INTEREST IN EXCESS OF AN EFFECTIVE RATE OF SIMPLE INTEREST OF 6%
PER YEAR ON THE UNPAID PRINCIPAL BALANCE OF AN OBLIGATION HELD BY AN
ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER.
(C) IF A SERVICE MEMBER IS ASSIGNED TO ACTIVE DUTY DURING THE TERM
OF REPAYMENT FOR AN OBLIGATION, INTEREST IN EXCESS OF 6% PER YEAR ON THE
OBLIGATION HELD BY THE SERVICE MEMBER SHALL BE REDUCED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) ON A REDUCTION OF AN ANNUAL INTEREST RATE UNDER SUBSECTION
(C) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) INTEREST CHARGES IN EXCESS OF 6% PER YEAR THAT WOULD
OTHERWISE BE OWED BUT FOR THE REDUCTION SHALL BE FORGIVEN; AND
(2) ANY PERIODIC PAYMENTS DUE DURING THE SERVICE MEMBER’S
TERM OF ACTIVE DUTY SHALL BE RECALCULATED AT THE REDUCED ANNUAL
INTEREST RATE USING THE SAME REPAYMENT FREQUENCY AND TERM THAT
EXISTED IMMEDIATELY BEFORE THE SERVICE MEMBER’S ACTIVE–DUTY
ASSIGNMENT.
(E) TO QUALIFY FOR AN INTEREST RATE REDUCTION UNDER THIS SECTION,
THE SERVICE MEMBER OR THE SERVICE MEMBER’S SPOUSE SHALL PROVIDE TO THE

SENATE BILL 317 3
CREDITOR NOT LATER THAN 180 DAYS AFTER THE SERVICE MEMBER IS
TERMINATED OR RELEASED FROM ACTIVE DUTY:
(1) WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE INTENTION TO HAVE AN OBLIGATION
SUBJECT TO THE INTEREST RATE LIMITATION UNDER THIS SECTION;
(2) A COPY OF THE MILITARY OR GUBERNATORIAL ORDERS CALLING
THE SERVICE MEMBER TO ACTIVE DUTY; AND
(3) A COPY OF ANY ORDERS EXTENDING ACTIVE–DUTY SERVICE.
(F) IF A COURT FINDS THAT THE ABILITY OF A SERVICE MEMBER OR A
SERVICE MEMBER’S SPOUSE TO PAY INTEREST CHARGES AT A RATE IN EXCESS OF
THE AMOUNT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IS NOT MATERIALLY AFFECTED BY
THE SERVICE MEMBER’S ASSIGNMENT TO ACTIVE DUTY, THE COURT MAY GRANT THE
CREDITOR RELIEF FROM THE INTEREST RATE LIMITATION OF THIS SECTION.
12–107.
If a charge or fee considered interest under this subtitle is charged at or before the
inception of a loan contract, the effective rate of simple interest permitted to be charged by
§§ 12–102, 12–102.1, and 12–103 of this subtitle, and required to be disclosed by § 12–106
of this subtitle shall be determined in the same manner as if the fee or charge had not been
charged, except that the principal of the loan used in determining the rate of interest is the
face amount of the loan less the fee or charge.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.